Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-206
Township or precinct officers; continuance in office.

All the township or precinct officers who were previously elected and qualified in the county or counties from which such new county has been formed, whose term of office shall not have expired at the time of the election, and whose residence shall be embraced within the limits of the new county, shall continue in office until their terms of office shall expire, and until their successors shall be elected and qualified.

Laws 1879, § 12, p. 357;

R.S.1913, § 917;

C.S.1922, § 823;

C.S.1929, § 25-206;

R.S.1943, § 22-206;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 110.